Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [290.0696] TEACHER CREDIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Eligible full-year teacher" means an individual who is a kindergarten through grade 12 teacher with a teaching position equivalent to at least 0.6 full-time equivalent, and: new text end new text begin (1) holds a valid Tier 1, Tier 2, Tier 3, or Tier 4 teaching license issued by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board under section 122A.18; and new text end new text begin (2) completes at least 150 student contact days of teaching service each school year, excluding days devoted to parent-teacher conferences, teachers' workshops, other staff development opportunities, and days on which a teacher is absent from school. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible part-year teacher" means an individual who is a kindergarten through grade 12 teacher with a teaching position equivalent to at least 0.6 full-time equivalent, and: new text end new text begin (1) holds a valid Tier 1, Tier 2, Tier 3, or Tier 4 teaching license issued by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board under section 122A.18; and new text end new text begin (2) completes at least 75, but fewer than 150, student contact days of teaching service each school year, excluding days devoted to parent-teacher conferences, teachers' workshops, other staff development opportunities, and days on which a teacher is absent from school. new text end new text begin (d) "Eligible teacher" means an eligible full-year teacher or eligible part-year teacher. new text end new text begin (e) "Threshold amount" means: new text end new text begin (1) $60,000 for an eligible full-year teacher; and new text end new text begin (2) $30,000 for an eligible part-year teacher. new text end new text begin (f) "Qualifying wages" means the amount of wages earned as an eligible teacher as reported under subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credit allowed. new text end new text begin (a) An eligible full-year teacher whose qualifying wages are less than the threshold amount under subdivision 1, paragraph (e), clause (1), is allowed a credit equal to $15,000. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible part-year teacher whose qualifying wages are less than the threshold amount under subdivision 1, paragraph (e), clause (2), is allowed a credit equal to $7,500. new text end new text begin (c) An eligible full-year teacher or eligible part-year teacher whose qualifying wages exceed the threshold amount is allowed a credit equal to $2,000. new text end new text begin (d) In the case of a married couple, each spouse is eligible for the credit in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Statement of qualifying wages. new text end new text begin By January 15 of each year, an employer of an eligible teacher must provide a statement to each eligible teacher and submit a copy of the statement to the commissioner. The statement must be in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The statement must include the amount of qualifying wages earned in the previous calendar year by the eligible teacher and the number of student contact days of teaching service in the previous calendar year by the eligible teacher. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Credit refundable; appropriation. new text end new text begin If the amount of credit that the claimant is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the claimant's tax liability under this chapter, the commissioner shall refund the excess to the claimant. An amount sufficient to pay the refunds required by this section is appropriated to the commissioner from the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Inflation adjustment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of revenue must annually adjust the threshold amount and the credit amounts in subdivision 2, paragraphs (a) to (c), for inflation, as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Advance payment of credits. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may establish a process to allow a taxpayer to elect to receive one or more advance payments of the credit under this section. The amount of advance payments must be based on the taxpayer's and commissioner's estimate of the amount of credit for which the taxpayer would be eligible in the taxable year beginning in the calendar year in which the payments were made. The commissioner must not distribute advance payments to a taxpayer who does not elect to receive advance payments. new text end new text begin (b) The amount of a taxpayer's credit under this section for the taxable year is reduced by the amount of advance payments received by the taxpayer in the calendar year during which the taxable year began. If the total amount of the advanced payments the taxpayer received for the taxable year exceeds the credit the taxpayer was eligible to receive for the taxable year, the taxpayer's liability for tax is increased by the difference between the amount of advance payments received and the credit amount. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end